Montana, session 2025, HB659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 16-12-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-12-301. Local government authority to regulate -- opt-in requirement in certain counties --
exemption for existing licensees. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b), a marijuana business may
not operate in a county in which the majority of voters voted against approval of Initiative Measure No. 190 in
the November 3, 2020, general election until:
(i) the category or categories of license that the marijuana business seeks has or have been
approved by the local jurisdiction where the marijuana business intends to operate as provided in subsection
(3) or (4); and
(ii) the business is licensed by the department pursuant to this chapter.
(b) A former medical marijuana licensee that does not apply for licensure as an adult-use
dispensary may operate in its existing premises in compliance with rules adopted by the department pursuant
to 16-12-201(2) notwithstanding a local jurisdiction's failure to take action pursuant to subsections (3) through
(6).
(c) A former medical marijuana licensee that intends to apply for licensure as a cultivator,
manufacturer, adult-use dispensary, or testing laboratory may operate in compliance with rules adopted by the
department pursuant to 16-12-201(2) notwithstanding a local jurisdiction's failure to take action pursuant to
subsections (3) through (6), provided that the former marijuana licensee has remained in good standing with
the department.
(d) For the purpose of this section, the marijuana business categories that must be approved by a
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 659

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0659.2
local jurisdiction under subsections (3) through (6) in a county in which the majority of voters voted against
approval of Initiative Measure No. 190 in the November 3, 2020, general election before a business may
operate are:
(i) cultivator;
(ii) manufacturer;
(iii) medical marijuana dispensary, except as provided in subsection (1)(b);
(iv) adult-use dispensary;
(v) combined-use marijuana licensee;
(vi) testing laboratory; and
(vii) marijuana transporter facility.
(e) Marijuana businesses located in counties in which the majority of voters voted to approve
Initiative Measure No. 190 in the November 3, 2020, general election are not subject to the local government
approval process under subsections (3) through (6).
(2) (a) To protect the public health, safety, or welfare, a local government may by ordinance or
otherwise regulate a marijuana business that operates within the local government's jurisdictional area. The
regulations may include but are not limited to inspections of licensed premises, including but not limited to
indoor cultivation facilities, dispensaries, manufacturing facilities, and testing laboratories in order to ensure
compliance with any public health, safety, and welfare requirements established by the department or the local
government.
(b) A former medical marijuana licensee that does not apply for licensure as an adult-use
dispensary is exempt from complying with any local governmental regulations that are adopted under this
subsection after July 1, 2021, until its first license renewal date occurring after January 1, 2022, or the
expiration of any grace period granted by the locality, whichever is later.
(3) An election regarding whether to approve any or all of the marijuana business categories listed
in subsection (1)(d) to be located within a local jurisdiction may be requested by filing a petition in accordance
with 7-5-131 through 7-5-135 and 7-5-137 by:
(a) the qualified electors of a county; or
(b) the qualified electors of a qualified municipality.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 659

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0659.2
(4) (a) An election held pursuant to this section must be called, conducted, counted, and
canvassed in accordance with Title 13, chapter 1, part 4.
(b) An election pursuant to this section may be held in conjunction with a regular election of the
governing body, general election, or a regular local or special election.
(5) If the qualified electors of a county vote to approve a type of marijuana business to be located
in the jurisdiction, the governing body shall enter the approval into the records of the local government and
notify the department of the election results.
(6) (a) If an election is held pursuant to this section in a county that contains within its limits a
municipality of more than 5,000 persons according to the most recent federal decennial census:
(i) it is not necessary for the registered qualified electors in the municipality to file a separate
petition asking for a separate or different vote on the question of whether to prohibit a category of marijuana
business from being located in the municipality; and
(ii) the county shall conduct the election in a manner that separates the votes in the municipality
from those in the remaining parts of the county.
(b) If a majority of the qualified electors in the county, including the qualified electors in the
municipality, vote to approve a category of marijuana business to be located in the county, the county may
allow that category of marijuana business to operate in the county.
(c) (i) If a two-thirds majority of the qualified electors in the a qualified municipality vote to approve
a category of marijuana business to be located in the municipality, the municipality may allow that type of
marijuana business to operate in the municipality.
(ii) If a two-thirds majority of the qualified electors in the a qualified THE municipality vote to prohibit
a category of marijuana business from being located in the municipality, the municipality may not allow that type
of marijuana business to operate in the municipality.
(d) Nothing contained in this subsection (6) prevents any qualified municipality from having a
separate election under the terms of this section.
(7) (a) A county or municipality that has voted to approve a category of marijuana business to be
located in the jurisdiction or a county in which the majority of voters voted to approve Initiative Measure No. 190
in the November 3, 2020, general election may vote to prohibit the previously approved or allowed operations
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 659

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0659.2
within the jurisdiction.
(b) A vote overturning the approval of a category of marijuana business or prohibiting the
previously permitted operation of marijuana businesses is effective on the 90th day after the local election is
held.
(8) A local government may not prohibit the transportation of marijuana within or through its
jurisdiction on public roads by any person licensed to do so by the department or as otherwise allowed by this
chapter.
(9) (a) For the purposes of this section, "qualified municipality" means a city or town that has
organized and currently manages and controls a local police department.
(b) The term does not include a city or town receiving law enforcement services from an external
law enforcement agency."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 659